Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
FORESTRY

23-31-201. Transfer to board of governors of the Colorado state university system - exceptions.

There is transferred to and vested in the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, referred to in this part 2 as the "board", all rights, powers, and duties for protecting, promoting, and extending the conservation of the forests in the state vested on or before February 14, 1955, in the state board of land commissioners, acting ex officio as the state board of forestry; but such authority shall not extend to nor include the power vested in the state board of land commissioners with respect to forest lands included in the public lands of the state under the control and jurisdiction of said state board of land commissioners, as provided by sections 9 and 10 of article IX of the state constitution and the laws relating thereto.

Effective July 1, 2012, the forestry functions of the board relating principally to fire and wildfire preparedness, response, suppression, coordination, or management are transferred by a type 2 transfer, as such transfer is defined in the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", article 1 of title 24, C.R.S., to the wildland fire management section in the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety created in section 24-33.5-1201, C.R.S.

Nothing in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) divests the board or the state forest service of any other personnel, functions, powers, or duties relating to forest resources, including risk education and prevention, forest health, management, stewardship, technical assistance, urban and community forestry, insect and disease monitoring and mitigation, research, education, outreach, planning, and fire ecology.

Any and all claims, liabilities, and damages, including costs and attorneys' fees, relating in any way to the performance of duties described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) that were performed by the board or its employees on or before June 30, 2012, are hereby transferred to and assumed by the state exclusively through the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety, and no other public entity or agency, including the board and its employees, shall be responsible or liable for any such claims, liabilities, or damages that arose before June 30, 2012.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 531, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1066, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-201 as it existed prior to 2007.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 240, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

23-31-202. Powers and duties of board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

The authority granted to the board by section 23-31-201 includes the following powers and duties:

To provide for the protection of the forest resources of the state, both public and private, from insects and diseases;

To foster and promote the control of soil erosion on such forest lands;

To carry on an educational program with landowners, in the application of the practice of forestry on forest lands, by the growing, harvesting, and marketing of forest products from such lands;

To disseminate information and statistics concerning forests and forestry in the state, subject to the control and approval of the executive director of the department of natural resources;

To conduct investigations and experiments tending to further the intent of this part 2;

To report to the executive director of the department of natural resources at such times and on such matters as the executive director may require; and

To cooperate with all agencies of the state which need and request the aid and assistance of a trained forester.

In addition to the powers and duties set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system shall enter into an agreement with the executive director of the department of natural resources pursuant to section 24-33-201 (1), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 531, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1067, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-202 as it existed prior to 2007.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsection (1)(a), see section 1 of chapter 240, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

23-31-203. Cooperation with governmental units. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 532, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-204. Forest fires - duty of sheriff to report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 532, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1137, § 55, effective July 1.

23-31-205. Provisions of act of congress accepted.

The state of Colorado does hereby accept the provisions of the act of congress dated June 7, 1924, entitled "Clarke-McNary Law", as amended.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 532, § 2, effective August 3.

23-31-206. Cooperative agreements.

The board is further authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with federal and state agencies to promote and carry out the intent and purposes of this part 2, and in carrying out the provisions of all federal acts providing funds to promote the practice of forestry; and, for the purpose of continued acceptance and participation in the provisions of the act of congress dated June 7, 1924, entitled the "Clarke-McNary Law", the board is designated as the agency of the state to administer and expend any federal appropriations received under said act of congress, pursuant to section 23-31-205.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including the transfer of functions effected by House Bill 12-1283, enacted in 2012, all interagency agreements regarding wildfire and prescribed fire management and control that are in effect as of July 1, 2012, to which the state forest service, or the board on its behalf, is a party, shall remain in full force and effect.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 532, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1067, § 4, effective July 1.

23-31-207. Employees and personnel.

The board is authorized to employ the necessary professional, clerical, and other personnel needed to carry out this part 2. Persons employed in a technical forestry capacity must have completed the requirements for and received a degree from an accredited school of forestry. Persons employed in other technical fields must have completed the requirements for and received a degree from an accredited school in their professional field. The board may appoint, pursuant to its personnel powers, in consultation with the executive director of the department of natural resources, to carry out the provisions of this part 2 and part 3 of this article, a professional forester, to be known as the state forester, whose duties shall be primarily of an educational or regulatory nature.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 532, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1071), ch. 44, p. 170, § 1, effective March 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-207 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-208. Rights by succession to state board of land commissioners - transfers to division of fire prevention and control.

On February 14, 1955, the board shall succeed to all records, documents, and equipment in the hands of the state board of land commissioners as pertain to and used by the state board of land commissioners in the performance of the rights, powers, and duties transferred, and the state board of land commissioners is directed to deliver said property to the board within a reasonable time.

On February 14, 1955, the state treasurer and the controller shall transfer to the board all funds, including federal grants-in-aid, remaining to the credit of the state board of land commissioners and appropriated or received for the administration of the rights, powers, and duties transferred by this section; but the transfer of funds shall not apply to any moneys appropriated for forest administration from the land commissioners' expense fund.

On July 1, 2012, the board's funds, moneys, positions of employment, personnel, and personal property that were, as of June 30, 2012, principally directed to fire and wildfire preparedness, response, suppression, coordination, or management and any and all claims and liabilities, whether known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, relating in any way to fire and wildfire preparedness, response, suppression, coordination, or management by the board, the state forest services or its employees on or before June 30, 2012, are transferred to the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety pursuant to section 24-33.5-1201, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 533, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1068, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-30-208 as it existed prior to 2007.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 240, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.